apertium-eng-kaz1/apertium-eng-kaz.eng.dix
    <pardef n="ab/ide__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ide</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ide</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ides</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ode</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ided</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ode</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ided</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iding</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iding</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iding</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="approach__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>es</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ed</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ed</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="admit__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ted</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ted</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ting</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ting</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ting</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="rot__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ted</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ten</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ting</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ting</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ting</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fit__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ted</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ted</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ting</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ting</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ting</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="agree__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>d</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>d</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

                            <e lm="submit" i=""><i>submit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="harass" i=""><i>harass</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="transmit" i=""><i>transmit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="undress" i=""><i>undress</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="bias" i=""><i>bias</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="dot the i's and cross the t's" i=""><i>dot</i><par n="admit__vblex"/><p><l><b/>the<b/>i's<b/>and<b/>cross<b/>the<b/>t's</l><r><g><b/>the<b/>i's<b/>and<b/>cross<b/>the<b/>t's</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="establish a frontline" i=""><i>establish</i><par n="approach__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>frontline</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>frontline</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="knot" i=""><i>knot</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="agree to" i=""><i>agree</i><par n="agree__vblex"/><p><l><b/>to</l><r><g><b/>to</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="abet" i=""><i>abet</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="abolish" i=""><i>abolish</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="address" i=""><i>address</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="admit" i=""><i>admit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="agree" i=""><i>agree</i><par n="agree__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="agree with" i=""><i>agree</i><par n="agree__vblex"/><p><l><b/>with</l><r><g><b/>with</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="assess" i=""><i>assess</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="shit" i=""><i>shit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="wet" i=""><i>wet</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="bewitch" i=""><i>bewitch</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trot" i=""><i>trot</i><par n="fit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="chat" i=""><i>chat</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="commit" i=""><i>commit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="decree" i=""><i>decree</i><par n="agree__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="diminish" i=""><i>diminish</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="disagree" i=""><i>disagree</i><par n="agree__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="dye" i=""><i>dye</i><par n="agree__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="establish" i=""><i>establish</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="fit" i=""><i>fit</i><par n="fit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="free" i=""><i>free</i><par n="agree__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="gloss" i=""><i>gloss</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="knit" i=""><i>knit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="mass" i=""><i>mass</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="omit" i=""><i>omit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="preach" i=""><i>preach</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="reach for" i=""><i>reach</i><par n="approach__vblex"/><p><l><b/>for</l><r><g><b/>for</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="regret" i=""><i>regret</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="remit" i=""><i>remit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="search for" i=""><i>search</i><par n="approach__vblex"/><p><l><b/>for</l><r><g><b/>for</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="submit" i=""><i>submit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="switch" i=""><i>switch</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="transmit" i=""><i>transmit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="witness" i=""><i>witness</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="enrich" i=""><i>enrich</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="rot" i=""><i>rot</i><par n="rot__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="unfit" i=""><i>unfit</i><par n="fit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="burnish" i=""><i>burnish</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="flit" i=""><i>flit</i><par n="fit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="leach" i=""><i>leach</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="pit" i=""><i>pit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="coach" i=""><i>coach</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
